Washington statutes.
RCW 36.61.180

Special assessments—Modification.

Whenever annual special assessments are being imposed, the county legislative authority may modify the level of annual special assessments imposed by conforming with the procedures and subject to the limitations included in RCW 36.61.120 through 36.61.170.

[ 1985 c 398 s 18.]